Washington, session 2025-2026, HB2048.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:(1) RCW 43.388.010 (Creation) and 2022 c 96 s 2, 2021 c 176 s 5222, 2020 c 114 s 18, 2018 c 67 s 1, & 2005 c 69 s 1;(2) RCW 43.388.020 (Washington state leadership board accountâWashington state leadership board special license plate account) and 2022 c 96 s 3;(3) RCW 43.388.030 (Use of state flag) and 2020 c 114 s 19 & 2005 c 69 s 2; and(4) RCW 43.388.040 (Sports mentoring program) and 2022 c 96 s 7 & 2018 c 67 s 3.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. Any residual balance of funds remaining in the Washington state leadership board account and the Washington state leadership board special license plate account on the effective date of this section, shall be transferred by the state treasurer to the state general fund.Sec. 3. RCW 43.15.020 and 2022 c 96 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:The lieutenant governor serves as president of the senate and is responsible for making appointments to, and serving on, the committees and boards as set forth in this section.(1) The lieutenant governor serves on the following boards and committees:(a) Capitol furnishings preservation committee, RCW 27.48.040;(b) Washington higher education facilities authority, RCW 28B.07.030;(c) Productivity board, also known as the employee involvement and recognition board, RCW 41.60.015;(d) State finance committee, RCW 43.33.010;(e) State capitol committee, RCW 43.34.010;(f) Washington health care facilities authority, RCW 70.37.030;(g) State medal of merit nominating committee, RCW 1.40.020; and(h) Medal of valor committee, RCW 1.60.020((; and(i) Washington state leadership board, RCW 43.388.010)).(2) The lieutenant governor, and when serving as president of the senate, appoints members to the following boards and committees:(a) Civil legal aid oversight committee, RCW 2.53.010;(b) Office of public defense advisory committee, RCW 2.70.030;(c) Washington state gambling commission, RCW 9.46.040;(d) Sentencing guidelines commission, RCW 9.94A.860;(e) State building code council, RCW 19.27.070;(f) Financial education public-private partnership, RCW 28A.300.450;(g) Joint administrative rules review committee, RCW 34.05.610;(h) Capital projects advisory review board, RCW 39.10.220;(i) Select committee on pension policy, RCW 41.04.276;(j) Legislative ethics board, RCW 42.52.310;(k) Washington citizens' commission on salaries, RCW 43.03.305;(l) Legislative oral history committee, RCW 44.04.325;(m) State council on aging, RCW 43.20A.685;(n) State investment board, RCW 43.33A.020;(o) Capitol campus design advisory committee, RCW 43.34.080;(p) Washington state arts commission, RCW 43.46.015;(q) PNWER-Net working subgroup under chapter 43.147 RCW;(r) Community economic revitalization board, RCW 43.160.030;(s) Washington economic development finance authority, RCW 43.163.020;(t) Joint legislative audit and review committee, RCW 44.28.010;(u) Joint committee on energy supply and energy conservation, RCW 44.39.015;(v) Legislative evaluation and accountability program committee, RCW 44.48.010;(w) Washington horse racing commission, RCW 67.16.014;(x) Correctional industries board of directors, RCW 72.09.080;(y) Joint committee on veterans' and military affairs, RCW 73.04.150;(z) Joint legislative committee on water supply during drought, RCW 90.86.020; and(aa) Statute law committee, RCW 1.08.001.Sec. 4. RCW 43.15.095 and 2022 c 96 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The legislative youth advisory council is established to examine issues of importance to youth, including but not limited to education, employment, strategies to increase youth participation in state and municipal government, safe environments for youth, substance abuse, emotional and physical health, foster care, poverty, homelessness, and youth access to services on a statewide and municipal basis.(2) The council consists of at least twenty-two members as provided in this subsection who, at the time of appointment, are aged fourteen to eighteen. The council shall select a chair from among its members.(3) Members shall serve two-year terms and, if eligible, may be reappointed for subsequent two-year terms.(4)(a) Students may apply annually to be considered for participation in the program by completing an online application form and submitting the application to the legislative youth advisory council. The council may develop selection criteria and an application review process. The council shall recommend candidates whose names will be submitted to the office of the lieutenant governor for final selection. The office of the lieutenant governor shall notify all applicants of the final selections.(b) The office of the lieutenant governor shall make the application available on the lieutenant governor's website.(5) Subject to the supervision of the office of the lieutenant governor, the council shall have the following duties:(a) Advising the legislature on proposed and pending legislation, including state budget expenditures and policy matters relating to youth;(b) Advising the standing committees of the legislature and study commissions, committees, and task forces regarding issues relating to youth;(c) Conducting periodic seminars for its members regarding leadership, government, and the legislature;(d) Accepting and soliciting for grants and donations from public and private sources to support the activities of the council; and(e) Reporting annually by December 1st to the legislature on its activities, including proposed legislation that implements recommendations of the council.(6) In carrying out its duties under this section, the council must meet at least three times per year. The council is encouraged to use technology, such as remote videoconferencing technology, to facilitate members' participation in meetings. The council is encouraged to invite local state legislators to participate in the meetings. The council is encouraged to poll other students in order to get a broad perspective on various policy issues. The council is encouraged to use technology to conduct polling.(7) Members may be reimbursed as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.(8) The office of the lieutenant governor shall provide administration, supervision, and facilitation support to the council. ((In facilitating the program, the office of the lieutenant governor may collaborate with the Washington state leadership board established in RCW 43.388.010.)) The senate and house of representatives may provide policy and fiscal briefings and assistance with drafting proposed legislation. The senate and the house of representatives shall each develop internal policies relating to staff assistance provided to the council. Such policies may include applicable internal personnel and practices guidelines, resource use and expense reimbursement guidelines, and applicable ethics mandates. Provision of funds, resources, and staff, as well as the assignment and direction of staff, remains at all times within the sole discretion of the chamber making the provision.(9) The office of the lieutenant governor, the legislature, any agency of the legislature, and any official or employee of such office or agency are immune from liability for any injury that is incurred by or caused by a member of the legislative youth advisory council and that occurs while the member of the council is performing duties of the council or is otherwise engaged in activities or receiving services for which reimbursement is allowed under subsection (7) of this section. The immunity provided by this subsection does not apply to an injury intentionally caused by the act or omission of an employee or official of the office of the lieutenant governor, the legislature, or any agency of the legislature.Sec. 5. RCW 46.68.420 and 2022 c 239 s 3, 2022 c 117 s 3, and 2022 c 96 s 4 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:(1) The department shall:(a) Collect special license plate fees established under RCW 46.17.220;(b) Deduct an amount not to exceed twelve dollars for initial issue and two dollars for renewal issue for administration and collection expenses incurred by it; and(c) Remit the remaining proceeds to the custody of the state treasurer with a proper identifying detailed report.(2) The state treasurer shall credit the proceeds to the motor vehicle fund until the department determines that the state has been reimbursed for the cost of implementing the special license plate. Upon determination by the department that the state has been reimbursed, the state treasurer shall credit the remaining special license plate fee amounts for each special license plate to the following appropriate account as created in this section in the custody of the state treasurer:ACCOUNTCONDITIONS FOR USE OF FUNDS4-H programsSupport Washington 4-H programsFred HutchSupport cancer research at the Fred Hutchinson cancer research centerGonzaga University alumni associationScholarship funds to needy and qualified students attending or planning to attend Gonzaga UniversityHelping kids speakProvide free diagnostic and therapeutic services to families of children who suffer from a delay in language or speech developmentLaw enforcement memorialProvide support and assistance to survivors and families of law enforcement officers in Washington killed in the line of duty and to organize, finance, fund, construct, utilize, and maintain a memorial on the state capitol grounds to honor those fallen officersLighthouse environmental programsSupport selected Washington state lighthouses that are accessible to the public and staffed by volunteers; provide environmental education programs; provide grants for other Washington lighthouses to assist in funding infrastructure preservation and restoration; encourage and support interpretive programs by lighthouse docentsMusic matters awarenessPromote music education in schools throughout WashingtonPatches pal, or alternative name as designated by the department under RCW 46.04.383Provide funds to the Seattle children's hospital strong against cancer programSan Juan Islands programsProvide funds to the Madrona instituteSeattle MarinersProvide funds to the ((sports mentoring program and to support the Washington world fellows program in the following manner: (a) Seventy-five percent to the Washington state leadership board solely to administer the sports mentoring program established under RCW 43.388.040, to encourage youth who have economic needs or face adversities to experience spectator sports or get involved in youth sports, and (b) up to twenty-five percent to the Washington state leadership board solely to administer the Washington world fellows program, an equity focused program))Mariners care foundation, or its successor organizationSeattle NHL hockeyProvide funds to the ((NHL Seattle foundation and to support the boundless Washington program in the following manner: (a) Fifty percent to the NHL Seattle foundation, or its successor organization, to help marginalized youth succeed in life through increased access to sports and other opportunities; (b) twenty-five percent to the Washington state leadership board solely to administer the boundless Washington program to facilitate opportunities for young people with physical and sensory disabilities to enjoy and experience the outdoors; and (c) twenty-five percent to the NHL Seattle foundation, or its successor organization, for providing financial support to allow youth to participate in hockey))one roof foundation, or its successor organizationSeattle SeahawksProvide funds to ((InvestED and to support the Washington world fellows program in the following manner: (a) Seventy-five percent, to InvestED, to encourage secondary students who have economic needs to stay in school, return to school, or get involved within their learning community; and (b) twenty-five percent to the Washington state leadership board solely to administer the Washington world fellows program, including the provision of fellowships))the Seattle Seahawks charitable foundation, or its successor organizationSeattle Sounders FCProvide funds to ((Washington state mentors and the Washington state leadership board in the following manner: (a) Seventy percent and the remaining proceeds, if any, to Washington state mentors, to increase the number of mentors in the state by offering mentoring grants throughout Washington state that foster positive youth development and academic success, with up to twenty percent of these proceeds authorized for program administration costs; and (b) up to thirty percent, not to exceed forty-thousand dollars annually as adjusted for inflation by the office of financial management, to the Washington state leadership board, to develop Washington state educational, veterans, international relations, and civics projects and to recognize the outstanding public service of individuals or groups in the state of Washington))the RAVE foundation, or its successor organizationSeattle StormProvide funds to the ((Washington state legislative youth advisory council and the Washington state leadership board in the following manner: Twenty-five thousand dollars per year of the net proceeds to the legislative youth advisory council, or its successor organization; and the remaining net proceeds on an annual basis, to the Washington state leadership board for the purpose of providing grants to support and enhance athletic, recreational, and other opportunities for women and girls, and especially those with disabilities))Seattle Storm foundation, or its successor organizationSeattle UniversityFund scholarships for students attending or planning to attend Seattle UniversityShare the roadPromote bicycle safety and awareness education in communities throughout WashingtonSki & ride WashingtonPromote winter snowsports, such as skiing and snowboarding, and related programs, such as ski and ride safety programs, underprivileged youth ski and ride programs, and active, healthy lifestyle programsState flowerSupport Meerkerk Rhododendron Gardens and provide for grants to other qualified nonprofit organizations' efforts to preserve rhododendronsVolunteer firefightersReceive and disseminate funds for purposes on behalf of volunteer firefighters, their families, and others deemed in needWashington applesProvide scholarship funding to the tree fruit industry's official charity, the Washington apple education foundation, which provides financial support, professional employment preparedness training, and mentorship to students with ties to the apple industry pursuing a higher educationWashington farmers and ranchersProvide funds to the Washington FFA Foundation for educational programs in Washington stateWashington state aviationProvide funds to the department of transportation to support infrastructure improvements at public use airports in Washington stateWashington state council of firefighters benevolent fundReceive and disseminate funds for charitable purposes on behalf of members of the Washington state council of firefighters, their families, and others deemed in needWashington state wrestlingProvide funds to the Washington state wrestling foundation to fund new and existing college wrestling programsWashington tennisProvide funds to cities to assist in the construction and maintenance of a public tennis facility with at least four indoor tennis courts. A city is eligible for construction funds if the city does not already have a public or private facility with at least four indoor tennis courts. Funds for construction must first be made available to the most populous eligible city, according to the most recent census, for a time period not to exceed five years after January 1, 2017. After the five-year time period, the funds for construction must be made available to the next most populous eligible city. Funds for the maintenance of a public tennis facility with at least four indoor tennis courts must first be made available to the first eligible city that utilizes funds for construction provided by chapter 16, Laws of 2016Washington wineProvide funds to the state of Washington tourism to promote tourism throughout Washington stateWashington's national park fundBuild awareness of Washington's national parks and support priority park programs and projects in Washington's national parks, such as enhancing visitor experience, promoting volunteerism, engaging communities, and providing educational opportunities related to Washington's national parksWe love our petsSupport and enable the Washington federation of animal welfare and control agencies to promote and perform spay/neuter surgery of Washington state pets in order to reduce pet population(3) Except as otherwise provided in this section, only the director or the director's designee may authorize expenditures from the accounts described in subsection (2) of this section. The accounts are subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.(4) Except as otherwise provided in this section, funds in the special license plate accounts described in subsection (2) of this section must be disbursed subject to the conditions described in subsection (2) of this section and under contract between the department and qualified nonprofit organizations that provide the services described in subsection (2) of this section.(5) Funds from the Seattle Seahawks account may be provided to the Washington state leadership board solely for the purpose of administering the Washington world fellows program. Of the amounts received by the Washington state leadership board under this subsection, at least ninety percent must be provided as fellowships under the program.(6) Beginning January 1, 2019, funds from the Seattle Mariners account may be provided to the Washington state leadership board solely for the purpose of administering the sports mentoring program. Of the amounts received by the Washington state leadership board, at least ninety percent must be applied towards services directly provided to youth participants.(7) For the purposes of this section, a "qualified nonprofit organization" means a not-for-profit corporation operating in Washington that has received a determination of tax exempt status under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3). The qualified nonprofit organization must meet all the requirements under RCW 46.18.100(1).--- END ---